Missouri, session 2026, SB1165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 162, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 162.059, to read as
follows:
162.059. 1. As used in this section, "released time
course" means a period of time during which a student is
excused from school to attend a course in religious or moral
instruction taught by an independent entity off school
property.
2. The school board of each school district shall
adopt a policy that excuses a student from school to attend
a released time course for no more than three class periods
per week or a maximum of one hundred twenty-five class
periods per school year, provided that:
(1) The student's parent or legal guardian provides
written consent prior to the student's participation in the
released time course;
(2) No school district funds other than de minimis
administrative costs are expended, and no school district
personnel, equipment, or resources are involved in providing
the instruction;

SB 1165 2
(3) The independent entity maintains attendance
records and makes them available to the school district and
its school board;
(4) Any transportation provided to and from the place
of instruction is the sole responsibility of the independent
entity, the student, or the student's parent or legal
guardian;
(5) The independent entity or the student's parent or
legal guardian indemnifies the school district and holds it
harmless with regard to any liability arising from conduct
that does not occur on school property under the control or
supervision of the school district, and the independent
entity or parent or legal guardian shall maintain adequate
insurance for such purpose;
(6) The student assumes responsibility for any missed
school work; and
(7) The school district superintendent, the principal
of the school in which the student is enrolled, or their
designees shall have reasonable discretion over the
scheduling and timing of released time courses, provided
that the student shall not be excused to participate in a
released time course during any class in which the subject
matter being taught is English language arts, mathematics,
science, or United States history.
3. The school district, its board of education, and
the state shall not be liable for a student who participates
in a released time course when the student is not under the
control or supervision of the school district.
4. For purposes of calculating a school district's
average daily attendance, as such term is defined in section
163.011, and establishing compliance with the provisions of
section 167.031, a student who attends a released time

SB 1165 3
course shall be considered in attendance in the school
district, and the time shall be calculated as part of the
school day.
5. The school board of a school district shall award a
student credit for work completed in a released time course
that is substantiated by a transcript from the independent
entity providing the course. A student shall be awarded
elective credit for the completion of each released time
course. To determine whether elective credit may be awarded
as provided for in this subsection, the school board shall
evaluate the course in a neutral and secular manner that
does not involve any test for religious content or
denominational affiliation. For purposes of this
subsection, the secular criteria used to evaluate a released
time course may include:
(1) The amount of classroom instruction time;
(2) The course syllabus, which reflects the course
requirements and any materials used in the course;
(3) Methods of assessment used in the course; and
(4) The qualifications of the course instructor.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
charter schools established pursuant to the provisions of
sections 160.400 to 160.425 or to virtual schools or virtual
providers authorized pursuant to the provisions of section
161.670.
✓